Maryland, session 2025, HB1545.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Finance and Procurement
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1545*

HOUSE BILL 1545
2–109.
WHEN THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT IS FOUND NOT IN COMPLIANCE WITH
COURT DECISIONS UPHOLDING FEDERAL CONGRESSIONALLY APPROVED SPENDING
AS PROVIDED IN § 10–208 OF THIS ARTICLE AND § 4–115 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE COMPTROLLER MAY WITHHOLD STATE PAYMENTS TO
THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT IN AN AMOUNT UP TO THE TOTAL OF DELINQUENT
FEDERAL FUNDS.
10–101.
In this title, “Board” means the Board of Public Works.
10–208.
THE BOARD MAY DETERMINE THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT TO BE
DELINQUENT IN FEDERAL FUNDS OWED TO THE STATE IN THE EVENT OF FEDERAL
NONCOMPLIANCE WITH COURT DECISIONS UPHOLDING CONGRESSIONALLY
APPROVED SPENDING.
Article – State Government
4–115.
FOR DELINQUENT FEDERAL FUNDS AS DETERMINED UNDER § 10–208 OF THE
STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE, THE COMPTROLLER, IN
CONSULTATION WITH THE BOARD OF PUBLIC WORKS, MAY WITHHOLD DELINQUENT
FEDERAL FUNDS IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–109 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND
PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, if any provision of this Act or
the application of any provision of this Act to any person or circumstance is held invalid for
any reason in a court of competent jurisdiction, the invalidity does not affect other
provisions or any other application of this Act that can be given effect without the invalid
provision or application, and for this purpose the provisions of this Act are declared
severable.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is an emergency
measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health or safety, has
been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by three–fifths of all the members elected to
each of the two Houses of the General Assembly, and shall take effect from the date it is
enacted.